apertium-dsb.dsb.metadix
    <pardef n="fabrikacij/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owu</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maś/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erje</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erju</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjowu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjoma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjoma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjoma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erje</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjam</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erje</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erjach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sa/da__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dy</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dowu</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>doma</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>doma</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>doma</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dy</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dow</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dam</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dy</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dami</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dach</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fabrikacija"><i>fabrikacij</i><par n="fabrikacij/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telewizija"><i>telewizij</i><par n="fabrikacij/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šula"><i>šul</i><par n="fabrikacij/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amplituda"><i>amplitu</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anoda"><i>ano</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antipoda"><i>antipo</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arkada"><i>arka</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="armada"><i>arma</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atitida"><i>atiti</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="awantgarda"><i>awantgar</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balada"><i>bala</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balustrada"><i>balustra</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barda"><i>bar</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barikada"><i>barika</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bawda"><i>baw</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biliarda"><i>biliar</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brigada"><i>briga</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cestoda"><i>cesto</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cikada"><i>cika</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dekada"><i>deka</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="designermoda"><i>designermo</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dioda"><i>dio</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diwidenda"><i>diwiden</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="domownjowěda"><i>domownjowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drastwowěda"><i>drastwowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="egida"><i>egi</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektroda"><i>elektro</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="episoda"><i>episo</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eskapada"><i>eskapa</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="esplanada"><i>esplana</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estrada"><i>estra</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etida"><i>eti</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fasada"><i>fasa</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="góspoda"><i>góspo</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garda"><i>gar</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gilda"><i>gil</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gouda"><i>gou</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helebarda"><i>helebar</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hitparada"><i>hitpara</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kamjenjowěda"><i>kamjenjowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanonada"><i>kanona</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaskada"><i>kaska</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="katoda"><i>kato</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolonada"><i>kolona</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krajowěda"><i>krajowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kumoda"><i>kumo</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="limonada"><i>limona</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mansarda"><i>mansar</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marinada"><i>marina</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marmelada"><i>marmela</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maskerada"><i>maskera</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metalowěda"><i>metalowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metoda"><i>meto</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miliarda"><i>miliar</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mjenjowěda"><i>mjenjowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nematoda"><i>nemato</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oda"><i>o</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olympiada"><i>olympia</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oranžada"><i>oranža</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pódbroda"><i>pódbro</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pagoda"><i>pago</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parada"><i>para</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pomada"><i>poma</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="promenada"><i>promena</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="propaganda"><i>propagan</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyramida"><i>pyrami</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pśedrunda"><i>pśedrun</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pśirada"><i>pśira</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pśiroda"><i>pśiro</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pśirodowěda"><i>pśirodowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pšawowěda"><i>pšawowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rasowěda"><i>rasowě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="remulada"><i>remula</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rezeda"><i>reze</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ruda"><i>ru</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sarabanda"><i>saraban</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekunda"><i>sekun</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soda"><i>so</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spartakiada"><i>spartakia</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="t-grěda"><i>t-grě</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trajda"><i>traj</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tšojosada"><i>tšojosa</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="weranda"><i>weran</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="łoboda"><i>łobo</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="špóda"><i>špó</i><par n="sa/da__n"/></e>
